Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2348.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21.7 of the General Laws entitled "The Nathan Bruno and Jason
Flatt Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21.7-5. Student identification cards.
(a) On or before September 8, 2026, all middle and high schools within and subject to the
jurisdiction of the department of elementary and secondary education (“RIDE”), which issue
student identification cards (“ID cards”), shall include on the back of each ID card the following:
(1) The telephone number for a state or national suicide prevention hotline; and
(2) The telephone number for a state or national substance abuse crisis center. Provided,
this requirement may be met through one telephone number to a state or national organization
which provides both suicide and substance abuse assistance and services, such as the 988 suicide
and crisis lifeline.
(b) All middle and high schools within and subject to the jurisdiction of RIDE which issue
staff ID cards to teachers, administrators, professional staff, and custodial staff working within the
school or school district shall also include or affix the information required under this section to
those ID cards.
(c) The information required under this section may be printed on the ID cards or contained
on a sticker affixed to the ID cards.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004732/SUB A
========
LC004732/SUB A - Page 2 of 3